Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1411
Commission; executive director, employees, consultants; compensation; recruitment expenses; rules and regulations; duties.

To assist it in carrying out its duties, the commission shall:

(1) Employ an executive director and all other employees of the office of the commission and hire consultants as may be necessary and prescribe their duties;

(2) Except as may be provided pursuant to the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, fix the compensation of the officers and employees of the office and provide benefits for all present or future employees of the commission, including retirement benefits, group life insurance, group hospital-medical insurance, and group long-term disability income insurance;

(3) Pay expenses for the recruitment of administrative and professional personnel for the commission; and

(4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act or as otherwise provided in the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act to carry out the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act and the powers and duties of the commission, except that for sections 85-1402 and 85-1413 to 85-1416, the provisions in section 84-908 for approval of the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule or regulation by the Governor shall not apply.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 14.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.